Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-235.01
School lands; forfeited leases; improvements, how treated.

All right, title, and interest in any and all improvements to a lease forfeited for failure to pay rental pursuant to section 72-235 also shall be forfeited to the Board of Educational Lands and Funds until the rental has been paid in full. The board shall have the authority to offer forfeited leases for sale without regard to any improvements and growing crops thereon.

Laws 1969, c. 591, § 2, p. 2443;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 27.